Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 5. Control of Rabies

§ 3801.
Rabies control authority.

In the event of an outbreak of rabies, the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, the Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife, and the Commissioner of Health shall work together to assist the affected towns. In addition to the responsibilities provided by this chapter, the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall generally be responsible for management of rabies in livestock, education of veterinarians and livestock owners concerning rabies, and vaccination recommendations for livestock. The Department of Fish and Wildlife shall generally be responsible for management of rabies in wildlife and the education of the sporting community, municipal officials, and the general public about rabies in wildlife. The Department of Health shall generally be responsible for the prevention of rabies in humans, management of rabies in animals that may have exposed humans, and assisting with diagnosis of rabies in animals that may have exposed humans and supervision of health officials’ education.

In addition to any other applicable authority, the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets, the Department of Health, and the Department of Fish and Wildlife may, individually or jointly, adopt rules to control the spread of rabies within a specific region or within the State as a whole. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets is authorized to adopt rules necessary to control the spread of rabies in domestic animals, domestic pets, and wolf-hybrids, including mandating the vaccination of specific species of animals, the conditions under which rabies inoculation clinics may be operated, and establishing quarantines for domestic animals. The Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife is authorized to adopt rules necessary to control the spread of rabies in wildlife, including mandating the vaccination of specific species of wild animals, translocation of wild animals, and the destruction of wild animals through the use of registered pesticides, trapping, or other means as may be necessary. The Commissioner of Health is authorized to adopt rules requiring the reporting of incidents of animals biting humans; the confinement, quarantine, observation, and disposition of animals that are suspected of exposing humans to rabies; and the disposition of animals bitten by animals suspected of carrying rabies and other rules as necessary to protect the general public from rabies.

The Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets, the Department of Health, and the Department of Fish and Wildlife may cooperate with other federal, state, and local officials in controlling the spread of rabies within the State and within the region.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 36

, § 4, eff. April 28, 1965;

1983, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 13, 1984;

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 23, eff. June 15, 1994;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 3802.
Quarantine.

With the approval of the Governor, a town, county, or the entire State may be placed under quarantine for such time as may be considered necessary by the Commissioner of Health or the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. June 15, 1994;

2003, No. 42

, § 2.

§ 3803.
Notice.

When a quarantine is established as provided in section 3802 of this title, notice of such quarantine shall be sent to the selectboard chairs, mayors, health officers, and to the town clerk of each municipality in the quarantined area.
Notice of such quarantine shall be printed in one or more newspapers circulating in the quarantined area.

§§ 3804,
3805.
Repealed.
1965, No. 36, § 6, eff. April 28, 1965.

§ 3806.
Confining or impounding a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid.

Any person authorized to enforce State livestock disease control, health, wildlife, or criminal laws and any person authorized to enforce local ordinances may confine or impound any domestic pet or wolf-hybrid when:

It is suspected of having been exposed to rabies.

It is believed to have been attacked by another animal that may be rabid.

It has been attacked by a wild animal.

It has been running at large in violation of any of the provisions of this subchapter.

It has an unknown rabies vaccination history.

In the event that a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid is confined or impounded under this section, the owner, if known, shall be notified within 24 hours. Notification may be accomplished by in-person communication, by telephone call, or by written statement sent to the last known address of the owner. If the owner’s address is not known, notification may be posted in the municipal clerk’s office and other usual places for public notice for a one-week period.

Any domestic pet or wolf-hybrid that is considered a rabies suspect shall be managed in accordance with the rules of the Department of Health. Rules adopted by the Department of Health in accordance with this chapter shall provide for management of domestic pets or wolf-hybrids for whom there is no approved rabies vaccine.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. June 15, 1994.

§ 3807.
Killing a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid.

When the legislative body, a municipal officer designated by the legislative body, the Commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Commissioner of the Department of Health, or the Secretary of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets reasonably suspects that a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid impounded under section 3806 of this title has been exposed to rabies, has been attacked by a rabid animal, or has been running at large in violation of any of the provisions of this subchapter, the official shall order the domestic pet or wolf-hybrid to be killed. However, if the official finds that it is not reasonable to suspect that a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid impounded under section 3806 of this title is rabid or has been exposed to rabies, the official may deliver the domestic pet or wolf-hybrid to the owner. When it is impractical to confine or impound a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid pursuant to section 3806 of this title, or when the owner of a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid confined or impounded cannot be ascertained, the officials may immediately order the domestic pet or wolf-hybrid to be killed.

In the event that a domestic pet is suspected of exposing a human, pet, wolf-hybrid, or domestic animal to rabies, it shall be managed in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter and the rules of the Department of Health.

Since there is no approved preexposure rabies vaccine for wolf-hybrids, until the Commissioner finds and approves a rabies vaccine, any wolf-hybrid that bites or otherwise exposes a human, pet, or domestic animal to rabies shall immediately be destroyed and its head shall be sent to the State Department of Health for the purpose of testing its brain tissue for the presence of the disease. If an alternative means of testing is provided by rule of the Department of Health, that procedure may be substituted for the procedure described in this subsection. The legislative body of the municipality or a municipal officer designated by the legislative body shall be responsible for ensuring the provisions of this subsection are carried out.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 26, eff. June 15, 1994;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 3808.
Fees for killing domestic pets or wolf-hybrids.

Officers shall be entitled to the same fees for killing domestic pets or wolf-hybrids under the provisions of this subchapter as are provided in section 3624 of this title. The owner of an impounded domestic pet or wolf-hybrid or the town, in case the owner of the domestic pet or wolf-hybrid cannot be identified, shall be liable for all such fees.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. June 15, 1994.

§ 3809.
Killing a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid that attacks a person or domestic animal.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed as preventing any person from killing a suspected rabid domestic pet or wolf-hybrid that attacks a person, another domestic pet or wolf-hybrid, or domestic animal. A person so killing such domestic pet or wolf-hybrid shall not be held liable for damages for such killing.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. June 15, 1994.

§ 3810.
Repealed. 1993, No. 213 (Adj. Sess.), § 32, eff. June 15, 1994.

§ 3811.
Carcass disposal.

In order to protect the public health, the legislative body of a municipality or a municipal officer designated by the legislative body may dispose of the carcass of any animal suspected of having been exposed to rabies through incineration. Disposal of animal carcasses in the manner provided by this section shall not be subject to the provisions of 10 V.S.A. chapter 23 and the rules adopted pursuant to that chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. June 15, 1994; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 209.

§ 3812.
Immunity from liability for volunteers.

Any person who as a volunteer conducts or assists at a nonprofit public clinic for inoculating domestic pets, wolf-hybrids, and domestic animals against rabies shall not be liable to any other person for injuries resulting from the loss of animals, animal bites, and from the inoculation process.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. June 15, 1994.

§ 3813.
Vaccination administration.

The Commissioner may purchase rabies vaccine for distribution at reduced cost to the public through rabies clinics.

The Commissioner shall ensure that reduced cost rabies clinics take place in all geographic areas of the State and shall cooperate with the veterinary profession to make certain that all owners of domestic pets and wolf-hybrids have access to reasonably priced rabies vaccines.

Veterinarians shall provide an owner of a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid with a completed rabies vaccination form and tag for each animal that has been inoculated against rabies.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 31, eff. June 15, 1994.